Rhode Island, session 2025, SB886.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-26-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-26 entitled "Renewable
Energy Standard" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-26-4. Renewable energy standard.
(a) Starting in compliance year 2007, all obligated entities shall obtain at least three percent
(3%) of the electricity they sell at retail to Rhode Island end-use customers, adjusted for electric
line losses, from eligible renewable energy resources, escalating, according to the following
schedule:
(1) At least three percent (3%) of retail electricity sales in compliance year 2007;
(2) An additional one-half of one percent (0.5%) of retail electricity sales in each of the
following compliance years 2008, 2009, 2010;
(3) An additional one percent (1%) of retail electricity sales in each of the following
compliance years 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, provided that the commission has determined the
adequacy, or potential adequacy, of renewable energy supplies to meet these percentage
requirements;
(4) An additional one and one-half percent (1.5%) of retail electricity sales in each of the
following compliance years 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, and 2022;
(5) [Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 144, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 155, § 1.]
(6) An additional four percent (4%) of retail electricity sales in 2023;

(7) An additional five percent (5%) of retail electricity sales in 2024;
(8) An additional six percent (6%) of retail electricity sales in 2025 2035;
(9) An additional seven percent (7%) of retail electricity sales in 2026 2036 and 2027 2037;
(10) An additional seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of retail electricity sales in 2028
2038;
(11) An additional eight percent (8%) of retail electricity sales in 2029 2039;
(12) An additional eight and one-half percent (8.5%) of retail electricity sales in 2030 2040;
(13) An additional nine percent (9%) of retail electricity sales in 2031 2041; and
(14) An additional nine and one-half percent (9.5%) of retail electricity sales in 2032 2042
and 2033 2043 to achieve the goal that one hundred percent (100%) of Rhode Island’s electricity
demand is from renewable energy by 2033 2043 and each year thereafter.
(b) For each obligated entity and in each compliance year, the amount of retail electricity
sales used to meet obligations under this statute that are derived from existing renewable energy
resources shall not exceed two percent (2%) of total retail electricity sales.
(c) The minimum renewable energy percentages set forth in subsection (a) shall be met for
each electrical energy product offered to end-use customers, in a manner that ensures that the
amount of renewable energy of end-use customers voluntarily purchasing renewable energy is not
counted toward meeting such percentages. Notwithstanding the foregoing, municipalities engaged
in aggregation pursuant to § 39-3-1.2 may include in their aggregation plan terms that would allow
voluntary renewable energy products to be counted toward meeting such percentages. In 2024, the
commission, with input from the office of energy resources, division of public utilities and carriers,
obligated entities, other market participants, and the public, shall assess the impact of allowing
voluntary renewable energy purchases to be counted toward meeting the annual percentages. The
commission shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor, speaker of
the house, and senate president no later than September 1, 2024.
(d) To the extent consistent with the requirements of this chapter, compliance with the
renewable energy standard may be demonstrated through procurement of NE-GIS certificates
relating to generating units certified by the commission as using eligible renewable energy sources,
as evidenced by reports issued by the NE-GIS administrator. Procurement of NE-GIS certificates
from off-grid and customer-sited generation facilities, verified by the commission as eligible
renewable energy resources, may also be used to demonstrate compliance. With the exception of
contracts for generation supply entered into prior to 2002, initial title to NE-GIS certificates from
off-grid and customer-sited generation facilities and from all other eligible renewable energy
resources, shall accrue to the owner of such a generation facility, unless such title has been
LC002553 - Page 2 of 4

explicitly deemed transferred pursuant to contract or regulatory order.
(e) In lieu of providing NE-GIS certificates pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, an
obligated entity may also discharge all or any portion of its compliance obligations by making an
alternative compliance payment to the renewable energy development fund established pursuant to
§ 39-26-7.
(f) Retail electricity sales pursuant to a nonregulated power producer’s supply contract that
was executed prior to July 1, 2022, shall be required to obtain an additional one and one-half percent
(1.5%) of retail electricity sales each year and are exempted from the requirements of subsections
(a)(6) through (a)(14) of this section until the end date of the term of the nonregulated power
producer’s supply contract.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002553
========
LC002553 - Page 3 of 4